apertium-hbs-eng.hbs.lexc
!            -*- coding: utf-8-unix; -*-
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adv%>	! Adjective
%<conj%>	! Conjunction
%<pres%>	! Present tense
%<name%>	! Proper noun
%<adj%>	! Adverb
%<pt%>	! Particle
%<sg%>	! Singular
%<pl%>	! Plural
%<pt%>	! Particle
%<pp%>	! Preposition
%<ii%>	! Inanimate
%<aa%>	! Animate
%<m%>	! Masculine
%<f%>	! Feminine
%<nt%>	! Neuter
%<ppron%>	! Personal pronoun
%<nom%>	! Nominative
%<gen%>	! Genitive
%<loc%> ! Locative/Dative
%<voc%> ! Vocative
%<acc%>	! Accusative
%<ins%> ! Instrumental
%<posspr%>	! Possessive pronoun
%<1p%>	! 1st person
%<2p%>	! 2nd person
%<3p%>	! 3rd person
%<clt%>	! Clitic
%<num%>	! Number

%<iv%>	! Intransitive verb
%<tv%>	! Intransitive verb
%<past%>	! Past Participle
%<refl%>	! Reflexive
lj nj dž {K} {G} {H} {A} {E} {Â} {J}
% 

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Conjunctions ;
Prepositions ;
Possessive_Pronouns ;
Particles ;
Reflexive ;
Number ;
Pronouns ;

LEXICON N_MASC

%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:a # ;
%<sg%>%<loc%>:u # ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:{E}m # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:{Â} # ;
%<pl%>%<loc%>:ima #;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:e # ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:ima # ;

LEXICON N_MASC_ANIMATE

%<n%>%<m%>%<aa%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<aa%>%<sg%>%<voc%>:e # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<aa%>: N_MASC ;

LEXICON N_MASC_INANIMATE

%<n%>%<m%>%<ii%>%<sg%>%<acc%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<ii%>%<sg%>%<voc%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<ii%>: N_MASC ;

LEXICON N_MASC_EV_PLURAL

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:u # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>: # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:{E}m # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:{E}vi # :
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:{E}v{Â} # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:{E}vima # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:{E}ve # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:{E}vima # ;

LEXICON N_NEUTER

%<sg%>%<gen%>:a # ;
%<sg%>%<loc%>:u # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:{Â} # ;
%<pl%>%<loc%>:ima # ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:a # ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:ima # ;

LEXICON N_NEUTER_E

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:e # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:e # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:em # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>: N_NEUTER ;

LEXICON N_NEUTER_O

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:om # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>: N_NEUTER ;

LEXICON N_NEUTER_VOWEL_ROOT

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>: # ;

LEXICON N_NEUTER_CONS_ROOT

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:u  # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:om  # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:{Â} # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ima # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ima # ;

LEXICON N_FEM_A

%<n%>%<f%>: N_A ;

LEXICON NAME_MASCULINE_A

%<n%>%<name%>%<m%>: N_A ;

LEXICON NAME_FEMININE_A

%<n%>%<name%>%<m%>: N_A ;

LEXICON N_PLURALIA_A

%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:e # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:i #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:u # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:om # ;

LEXICON N_A

%<sg%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:e # ;
%<sg%>%<loc%>:i # ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:u # ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:om # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:e # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:{Â} # ;
%<pl%>%<loc%>:ama #;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:e # ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:ama # ;

LEXICON N_DUAL

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:u # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:om # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:{J}i # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:{J}iju # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:{J}ima #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:{J}i # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:{J}ima # ;

LEXICON Nouns

dan:dan N_MASC_INANIMATE ; 
drvo:drvo N_NEUTER_VOWEL_ROOT ; 
vrijeme:vrijeme N_NEUTER_VOWEL_ROOT ;
drvo:drvet N_NEUTER_CONS_ROOT ; 
vrijeme:vremen N_NEUTER_CONS_ROOT ; 
pitanje:pitanj N_NEUTER_E ; 
brojanje:brojanj N_NEUTER_E ; 
selo:sel N_NEUTER_O ;
odgovor:odgovor N_MASC_INANIMATE ; 
prozor:prozor N_MASC_INANIMATE ; 
dječak:dječa{K} N_MASC_ANIMATE ; 
pas:p{A}s N_MASC_ANIMATE ; 
stolac:stol{A}c N_MASC_INANIMATE ; 
stol:stol N_MASC_EV_PLURAL ; 
vrt:vrt N_MASC_EV_PLURAL ; 
kuća:kuć N_FEM_A ; 
mačka:mač{A}k N_FEM_A ; 
majka:maj{A}{K} N_FEM_A ; 
ptica:ptic N_FEM_A ; 
Marica:Maric NAME_FEMININE_A ; 
ruka:ru{K} N_FEM_A ; 
igra:igr N_FEM_A ; 
sestra:sest{A}r N_FEM_A ; 
djeca:djec N_PLURALIA_A ; 
godina:godin N_FEM_A ; 
djevojčica:djevojčic N_FEM_A ; 
oko:ok N_DUAL;
uho:uh N_DUAL;
Ivica:Ivic NAME_MASCULINE_A ;

LEXICON ADJ_GENDER

%<adj%>%<m%>: ADJ_MN ;
%<adj%>%<nt%>: ADJ_MN ;
%<adj%>%<f%>: ADJ_FEM ;
%<adj%>%<m%>%<ii%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<m%>%<aa%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:{E}ga # ;
%<adj%>%<m%>%<aa%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:{E}g # ;
%<adj%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<adj%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:e # ;
%<adj%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:{E} # ;
%<adj%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:{E} # ;
%<adj%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:a # ;

LEXICON ADJ_FEM

%<sg%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:e # ;
%<sg%>%<loc%>:oj # ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:u # ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:im # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:e # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ih # ;
%<pl%>%<loc%>:im #;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:e # ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:im # ;

LEXICON ADJ_MN

%<sg%>%<gen%>:{E}ga # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:{E}g # ;
%<sg%>%<loc%>:{E}m # ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:im # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ih # ;
%<pl%>%<loc%>:im #;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:im # ;

LEXICON Adjectives

hladan:hlad{A}n ADJ_GENDER ;
star:star ADJ_GENDER ;
lijep:lijep ADJ_GENDER ;
veliki:velik ADJ_GENDER ;
mali:mal ADJ_GENDER ;
loš:loš ADJ_GENDER ;
topao:top{A}l ADJ_GENDER ;
sretan:sret{A}n ADJ_GENDER ;
malen:malen ADJ_GENDER ;

LEXICON POSSP

%<posspr%>: ADJ_GENDER ;

LEXICON Possessive_Pronouns

njegov:njegov POSSP ; 
njezin:njezin POSSP ; 
njen:njen POSSP ; 
njihov:njihov POSSP ; 
moj:moj POSSP ;
tvoj:tvoj POSSP ; 
naš:naš POSSP ; 
vaš:vaš POSSP ;
svoj:svoj POSSP ;

LEXICON ADV 

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON Adverbs

vani ADV ;
jučer ADV ;
danas ADV ;
uvijek ADV ;
onda ADV ;
jako ADV ;
zajedno ADV ;
sada ADV ;
sad ADV ;
još% uvek ADV;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON Number

dva NUM ;
dve NUM ;
pet NUM ;
šest NUM ;


LEXICON RFX

%<refl%>: # ;

LEXICON Reflexive

se RFX ;



LEXICON PT 

%<pt%>: # ;

LEXICON Particles

no PT ;
i PT ;




LEXICON PP

%<pp%>: # ;

LEXICON Prepositions

u PP ;
na PP ;
ispred PP ;
blizu PP ;
od PP ;
do PP ;
prije PP ;
kroz PP ;
s PP ;
sa PP ;
iza PP ;





LEXICON CONJ

%<conj%>: # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions

a CONJ ;
ali CONJ ;
i CONJ ;
niti CONJ ;





LEXICON V_ENDINGS

%<sg%>%<1p%>:m # ;
%<sg%>%<2p%>:š # ;
%<sg%>%<3p%>: # ;
%<pl%>%<1p%>:mo # ;
%<pl%>%<2p%>:te # ;

LEXICON V-A-COMMON

%<pres%>: V_ENDINGS ;
%<pres%>%<pl%>%<3p%>:ju #;
%<past%>: V_PARTICIPLE ;
%<inf%>:ti # ;

LEXICON V-I-COMMON

%<pres%>:i V_ENDINGS ;
%<pres%>%<pl%>%<3p%>:e #;
%<past%>:i V_PARTICIPLE ;
%<inf%>:iti # ;

LEXICON V_COPULA

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<clt%>%<sg%>%<1p%>:sam # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<clt%>%<sg%>%<2p%>:si # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<clt%>%<sg%>%<3p%>:je # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<clt%>%<pl%>%<1p%>:smo # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<clt%>%<pl%>%<2p%>:ste # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<clt%>%<pl%>%<3p%>:su # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<1p%>:jesam # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<2p%>:jesi # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<3p%>:jeste # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<1p%>:jesmo # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<2p%>:jeste # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<3p%>:jesu # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>:bi V_PARTICIPLE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<inf%>:biti # ;

LEXICON V_PARTICIPLE

%<sg%>%<m%>:o # ;
%<sg%>%<f%>:la # ;
%<sg%>%<nt%>:lo # ;
%<pl%>%<m%>:li # ;
%<pl%>%<f%>:le # ;
%<pl%>%<nt%>:la # ;

LEXICON V-JE-COMMON

%<pres%>:i V_ENDINGS ;
%<past%>%<sg%>%<m%>:io # ;
%<past%>%<sg%>%<f%>:jela # ;
%<past%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:jelo # ;
%<past%>%<pl%>%<m%>:jeli # ;
%<past%>%<pl%>%<f%>:jele # ;
%<past%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:jela # ;
%<inf%>:jeti # ;

LEXICON V_HTJETI

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<1p%>:hoću # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<2p%>:hoćeš # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<3p%>:hoće # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<1p%>:hoćemo # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<2p%>:hoćete # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<3p%>:hoće # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<m%>:htio # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<f%>:htjela # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:htjelo # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<m%>:htjeli # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<f%>:htjele # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:htjela # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<inf%>:htjeti # ;

LEXICON V_MOCI

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<1p%>:mogu # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<2p%>:možeš # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<3p%>:može # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<1p%>:možemo # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<2p%>:možete # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<3p%>:mogu # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<m%>:mogao # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<f%>:mogla # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:moglo # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<m%>:mogli # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<f%>:mogle # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:mogla # ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<inf%>:moći # ;

LEXICON V-TV-A

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-A-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-IV-A

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-A-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-TV-I

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-I-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-IV-I

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-I-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-TV-JE

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-JE-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-IV-JE

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-JE-COMMON ; 

LEXICON Verbs

obožavati:obožava V-TV-A ;
igrati:igra V-IV-A ;
igrati:igra V-TV-A ;
biti: V_COPULA ;
gledati:gleda V-TV-A ;
gledati:gleda V-IV-A ;
spavati:spava V-IV-A ;
nemati:nema V-TV-A ;
dobivati:dobiva V-TV-A ;
imati:ima V-TV-A ;
skrivati:skriva V-IV-A ;
znati:zna V-IV-A ;
znati:zna V-TV-A ;
misliti:misl V-IV-I ;
raditi:rad V-IV-I ;
vidjeti:vid V-TV-JE ;
voljeti:vol V-TV-JE ;
htjeti: V_HTJETI ;
moći: V_MOCI ;

LEXICON PRON_NOM

%<%ppron>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON_ACC

%<%ppron>%<acc%>: # ;
 
LEXICON PRON_OBL_F

%<acc%>:u # ;
%<gen%>:e # ;
%<ins%>:om # ;
%<loc%>:oj # ;

LEXICON PRON_OBL_MN

%<gen%>:{E}ga # ;
%<ins%>:im # ;
%<ins%>:ime # ;
%<loc%>:emu # ;

LEXICON PRON_OBL_PL

%<gen%>:ih # ;
%<ins%>:ima # ;
%<loc%>:ima # ;

LEXICON PRON_GENDER

%<%qpron>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:on #;
%<%qpron>%<m%>%<sg%>:nj PRON_OBL_MN ;
%<%qpron>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:oni #;
%<%qpron>%<m%>%<pl%>:nj PRON_OBL_PL ;
%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ono #;
%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<sg%>:nj PRON_OBL_MN ;
%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ona #;
%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<pl%>:nj PRON_OBL_PL ;
%<%qpron>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ona #;
%<%qpron>%<f%>%<sg%>:nj PRON_OBL_F ;

LEXICON PRON_STO

%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:što #;
%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:što #;
%<%qpron>%<nt%>%<sg%>:č PRON_OBL_MN ;

LEXICON Pronouns
on: PRON_GENDER_ON ;
što: PRON_STO ;
